South Dakota, session 2026, HB1169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 34-20B:
Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains medetomidine is a
Schedule III controlled drug or substance, except in the following cases:
(1) Dispensing, prescribing, or administering, to an animal, a drug that contains
medetomidine and has been approved by the United States secretary of health and
human services under 21 U.S.C. § 360b (January 1, 2026);
(2) Dispensing, prescribing, or administering medetomidine to an animal, as
permissible under 21 U.S.C. § 360b(a)(4) (January 1, 2026);
(3) Manufacturing, distributing, or using medetomidine as an active pharmaceutical
ingredient for manufacturing an animal drug:
(a) Approved under 21 U.S.C. § 360b (January 1, 2026); or
(b) Issued an investigational use exemption under 21 U.S.C. § 360b(j)
(January 1, 2026);
(4) Manufacturing, distributing, or using a medetomidine bulk chemical for
pharmaceutical compounding by a licensed pharmacist or veterinarian; or
(5) Any other use approved or permissible under 21 U.S.C. §§ 301 to 399i, inclusive
(January 1, 2026).

26.708.10 2 1169
An Act to classify medetomidine as a Schedule III controlled substance and establish
permissible uses.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1169
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1169 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1169 ENROLLED